Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7994A. OPEN R FRESH WATER SUPPLY DISTRICT OF CALDWELL COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7994A.0101. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the Open R Fresh Water Supply District of Caldwell County.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0102. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a municipal utility district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0103. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC PURPOSE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public purpose and benefit.

(b) The district is created to accomplish the purposes of:

(1) a municipal utility district as provided by general law and Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution; and

(2) Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, that relate to the construction, acquisition, improvement, operation, or maintenance of macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0104. DISTRICT TERRITORY. (a) The district is composed of the territory described by Section 2 of the Act enacting this chapter.

(b) The boundaries and field notes contained in Section 2 of the Act enacting this chapter form a closure. A mistake made in the field notes or in copying the field notes in the legislative process does not affect the district's:

(1) organization, existence, or validity;

(2) right to issue any type of bond for the purposes for which the district is created or to pay the principal of and interest on a bond;

(3) right to impose a tax; or

(4) legality or operation.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 7994A.0201. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the district is created.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0202. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0203. AUTHORITY FOR ROAD PROJECTS. Under Section 52, Article III, Texas Constitution, the district may design, acquire, construct, finance, issue bonds for, improve, operate, maintain, and convey to this state, a county, or a municipality for operation and maintenance macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements, including storm drainage, and landscaping, in aid of those roads.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0204. ROAD STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS. (a) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulations of each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the road project is located.

(b) If a road project is not located in the corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, the road project must meet all applicable construction standards, subdivision requirements, and regulations of each county in which the road project is located.

(c) If the state will maintain and operate the road, the Texas Transportation Commission must approve the plans and specifications of the road project.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7994A.0301. ELECTIONS REGARDING TAXES OR BONDS. (a) The district may issue, without an election, bonds and other obligations secured by:

(1) revenue other than ad valorem taxes; or

(2) contract payments described by Section 7994A.0303.

(b) The district must hold an election in the manner provided by Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, to obtain voter approval before the district may impose an ad valorem tax or issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes.

(c) The district may not issue bonds payable from ad valorem taxes to finance a road project unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0302. OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE TAX. (a) If authorized at an election held under Section 7994A.0301, the district may impose an operation and maintenance tax on taxable property in the district in accordance with Section 49.107, Water Code.

(b) The board shall determine the tax rate. The rate may not exceed the rate approved at the election.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0303. CONTRACT TAXES. (a) In accordance with Section 49.108, Water Code, the district may impose a tax other than an operation and maintenance tax and use the revenue derived from the tax to make payments under a contract after the provisions of the contract have been approved by a majority of the district voters voting at an election held for that purpose.

(b) A contract approved by the district voters may contain a provision stating that the contract may be modified or amended by the board without further voter approval.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER D. BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS

Sec. 7994A.0401. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. The district may issue bonds or other obligations payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, impact fees, revenue, contract payments, grants, or other district money, or any combination of those sources, to pay for any authorized district purpose.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0402. TAXES FOR BONDS. At the time the district issues bonds payable wholly or partly from ad valorem taxes, the board shall provide for the annual imposition of a continuing direct ad valorem tax, without limit as to rate or amount, while all or part of the bonds are outstanding as required and in the manner provided by Sections 54.601 and 54.602, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 7994A.0403. BONDS FOR ROAD PROJECTS. At the time of issuance, the total principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance road projects and payable from ad valorem taxes may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 216 (S.B. 2576), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.